North Dakota, session 69, HB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 1-03-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
1-03-13. First NationsIndigenous Peoples Day.
To recognize the indigenous peoples of the State of North Dakota and their contributions to the
state and to the United States, the governor shall issue a proclamation each year designating the
Friday before the second Monday in October as First NationsIndigenous Peoples Day.

H. B. NO. 1545 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1545.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 1 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State